Utah statutes.
32B-4-402.   Unauthorized sale, offer for sale, or furnishing.

A person authorized by this title to sell an alcoholic product and staff of that person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish, an alcoholic product in any place, or at any day or time other than as authorized by this title or the rules of the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

